Hawaii statutes.
§128D-10 Knowing releases. Any
person who knowingly releases a hazardous substance into the environment in an
amount above the reportable quantity established in the rules (other than a
permitted release pursuant to and in accord with a federal, state, or county
permit), shall be subject to prosecution for a class C felony or shall be
punished by a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 per day of violation. [L
1990, c 298, pt of §17; am L 1991, c 280, §11]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next